Nevada, session 83, AB475.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Clark County the sum of $15,000,000 for eviction
diversion programs.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may be:
(a) Awarded as a grant to another entity to carry out an eviction
diversion program.
(b) Used for administrative costs to carry out an eviction
diversion program, except not more than 10 percent of the money
appropriated by subsection 1 may be used for such administrative
costs by Clark County or any entity to which a grant is awarded
pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the County Manager of Clark County agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Clark County
through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by Clark County
through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of Clark County, regardless of their form or location, that
the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an audit of the
use of the money appropriated by subsection 1.
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the City of Reno the sum of $5,250,000 for eviction
diversion programs.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may be:
(a) Awarded as a grant to another entity to carry out an eviction
diversion program.
(b) Used for administrative costs to carry out an eviction
diversion program, except not more than 10 percent of the money
appropriated by subsection 1 may be used for such administrative
costs by the City of Reno or any entity to which a grant is awarded
pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may not be used to
fund or be awarded as a grant to another entity to carry out an
eviction diversion program that:
(a) Prohibits residents of unincorporated Washoe County or of
the City of Sparks from participating in the program.
(b) Establishes program eligibility requirements for residents of
unincorporated Washoe County or of the City of Sparks that are
more restrictive than any requirements established for participants
who are residents of the City of Reno.
4. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the City Manager of the City of Reno agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the City of Reno
through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the City of Reno
through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the City of Reno, regardless of their form or location,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an audit of
the use of the money appropriated by subsection 1.
5. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Rural Housing Authority the sum of
$750,000 for eviction diversion programs.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may be:
(a) Awarded as a grant to another entity to carry out an eviction
diversion program.
(b) Used for administrative costs to carry out an eviction
diversion program, except not more than 10 percent of the money
appropriated by subsection 1 may be used for such administrative
costs by the Nevada Rural Housing Authority or any entity to which
a grant is awarded pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the Nevada Rural Housing Authority agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Rural Housing Authority through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Rural Housing Authority through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the Nevada Rural Housing Authority, regardless of
their form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary
to conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated by
subsection 1.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)